Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-312.01
Dissolved corporation; suit authorized.

Any dissolved corporation may be sued by its corporate name upon any cause of action accrued against such corporation or which but for such dissolution would have accrued, with the same effect as if it had not been dissolved.

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 15.